Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2279YH (3) 91 lh/ko H.F. 467 Section 1. Section 217.43, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) A member shall reside in the county 3 that the county advisory board serves. 4